District of Columbia statutes.
31-5318

Investments.

A domestic society shall invest its funds only in investments authorized by the laws of the District for the investment of assets of life insurers and subject to the limitations therein. Any foreign or alien society permitted or seeking to do business in the District which invests its funds in accordance with the laws of the state, district, territory, country or province in which it is incorporated, shall be held to meet the requirements of this section for the investment of funds.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1219, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1248.